Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act

403.400.
Purposes — Construction. [Repealed.]

403.410.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

403.420.
Prerequisites to jurisdiction — Commencement of proceeding. [Repealed.]

403.430.
Notice and opportunity to be heard. [Repealed.]

403.440.
Notice to persons outside state — Exception. [Repealed.]

403.450.
Simultaneous proceedings in other states. [Repealed.]

403.460.
Inconvenient forum. [Repealed.]

403.470.
Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct. [Repealed.]

403.480.
Information under oath to be submitted to court — Continuing duty. [Repealed.]

403.490.
Joinder of parties. [Repealed.]

403.500.
Court appearance of parties and the child. [Repealed.]

403.510.
Binding force and res judicata effect of custody decree. [Repealed.]

403.520.
Recognition of out-of-state decree. [Repealed.]

403.530.
Modification of decree of another state. [Repealed.]

403.540.
Filing and enforcement of custody decree of another state. [Repealed.]

403.550.
Registry of out-of-state custody decrees and proceedings. [Repealed.]

403.560.
Certified copies of custody decree. [Repealed.]

403.570.
Taking testimony in another state. [Repealed.]

403.580.
Hearings and studies in another state — Orders to appear. [Repealed.]

403.590.
Assistance to courts of other states. [Repealed.]

403.600.
Preservation of court records — Use in other states. [Repealed.]

403.610.
Request for court records of another state. [Repealed.]

403.620.
International application. [Repealed.]

403.630.
Short title. [Repealed.]